District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.108

Determination of eligible projects.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to establish the process and criteria for the determination of which public schools or public charter schools will be presented to the Council for approval as a Qualifying School.

(b)

If the Mayor determines to present a public school or public charter school for Council approval as a Qualifying School, the Mayor shall enter into negotiations with the District of Columbia Board of Education with respect to public schools or with the respective public charter school with respect to public charter schools to determine the amount of bond proceeds and Available Real Property Tax Revenues to be allocated and the terms and conditions of the agreement between the District and the District of Columbia Board of Education or the Qualifying School.

(c)

The Mayor shall transmit to the Council a proposed resolution approving the issuance of a series of bonds and identifying the Qualifying Schools, the amount of the project or projects eligible to be financed with the bond proceeds, and the amount of Available Real Property Tax Revenues to be allocated to the bonds.

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-28, § 8, 52 DCR 8093
This section is referenced in § 2-1217.109.